District of Columbia statutes.
7-1202.07

Limited disclosure to 3rd-party payors.

(a)

A mental health professional or mental health facility may disclose to a 3rd-party payor mental health information necessary to determine the client’s entitlement to, or the amount of, payment benefits for professional services rendered; provided, that the disclosure is pursuant to a valid authorization, or for participating providers, a joint consent, and that the information to be disclosed is limited to:

(1)

Administrative information;

(2)

Diagnostic information;

(3)

The status of the client (voluntary or involuntary);

(4)

The reason for admission or continuing treatment; and

(5)

A prognosis limited to the estimated time during which treatment might continue.

(b)

In the event the 3rd-party payor questions the client’s entitlement to or the amount of payment benefits following disclosure under subsection (a) of this section, the 3rd-party payor may, pursuant to a valid authorization, or for participating providers, a joint consent, request an independent review of the client’s record of mental health information by a mental health professional or professionals. Mental health information disclosed for the purpose of review shall not be disclosed to the 3rd-party payor.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 207, 25 DCR 5055
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(f)(3), 48 DCR 7674
This section is referenced in § 44-301.07.
1981 Ed., § 6-2017.
1973 Ed., § 6-1621.
D.C. Law 14-56, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “, or for participating providers, a joint consent,” after “a valid authorization”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(f)(3) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(f)(3) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(f)(3) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(f)(3) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).